Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 90.
[BONDS FOR ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT] (CONST. AMEND. 82 AMENDED).

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment amended Ark. Const. Amend. 82, and is incorporated within that amendment. The amendment, effective December 2, 2010, was proposed by H.J.R. 1007 during the 2009 Regular Session and adopted at the 2010 general election by a vote of 431,724 for and 260,735 against.

The bracketed heading was added by the Publisher.